Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 General Provisions

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 68, § 3, effective July 1, 2007, designated the existing provisions of this chapter as Article 1 and enacted Article 2 thereof.

47-21-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Regents Retirement Plan Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 2.

47-21-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board of regents” means the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

“Board of trustees” means the Board of Trustees of the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia.

“Earnable compensation” means the full rate of regular compensation payable to a participating employee for the employee’s normal working time and includes compensation paid to the employee by an employer from grants or contracts made by outside agencies with the employer.

“Participating employee” means an eligible university system employee, as defined in Code Section 47-3-68, who elects to participate in the retirement plan provided for in this chapter pursuant to the provisions of said Code Section 47-3-68.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 2.

47-21-3.
Establishment and administration of optional retirement plan; designation of companies from which contracts will be purchased.

The board of regents is authorized to establish an optional retirement plan under which it may purchase annuity contracts, either fixed or variable or a combination thereof, or shares in one or more mutual funds providing retirement and death benefits which shall become the property of participating employees of the University System of Georgia.

The board of regents shall provide for the administration and maintenance of the optional retirement plan authorized by this chapter.

The board of regents shall designate at least two but no more than five companies from which contracts will be purchased. In making this designation, the board of regents shall consider the following:

The nature and extent of the rights and benefits to be provided by the contracts for participating employees and their beneficiaries;

The relation of the rights and benefits to the amount of the contributions to be made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

The suitability of the rights and benefits to the needs and interests of participating employees and the University System of Georgia;

The ability of the designated companies to provide the rights and benefits under such contracts; and

The efficacy of the contracts in the recruitment and retention of faculty and principal administrators.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 334, § 2.

47-21-4.
Employee and other contributions.

On and after July 1, 2013, each participating employee shall contribute to the optional retirement plan a percentage of his or her earnable compensation as determined by the board of regents.

The University System of Georgia shall contribute to the optional retirement plan on behalf of each participating employee the following:

Prior to January 1, 1997, an amount equal to 4 percent of the participating employee’s earnable compensation;

On and after January 1, 1997, and before January 1, 2009, an amount equal to the normal cost contribution determined by the board of trustees in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 47-3-48; and

On and after January 1, 2009, an amount determined by the board of regents after consulting with the state auditor, the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, and the state accounting officer. The board of regents shall review the contribution amount every three years.

The participating employee’s contribution required by the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section may be made by a reduction in earnable compensation or by an employer pickup pursuant to the authority of any applicable provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code, as amended. The method of contribution provided for in this subsection shall be a privilege for the convenience of employees and no right of action shall accrue to the employee or any company designated to provide such optional retirement plan for errors, omissions, or decisions of any agent of the University System of Georgia regarding deductions under this subsection.

All contributions authorized or required by this Code section shall be paid to the designated companies for the benefit of each participating employee by the financial officer of the employing institution.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 660, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 347, § 2/HB 815; Ga. L. 2013, p. 787, § 1/HB 232.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in paragraph (b)(1), deleted “and” at the end; in paragraph (b)(2), inserted “and before January 1, 2009,” in the first sentence and substituted “; and” for “The provisions of this subsection are subject to subsequent legislation; provided, however, that such legislation shall not provide for a rate of contribution lower than 4 percent.” at the end; and added paragraph (b)(3).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in subsection (a), substituted “On and after July 1, 2013, each” for “Each” at the beginning, and substituted “board of regents” for “board of trustees which shall be not less than 5 nor more than 6 percent” near the end.

47-21-5.
[Reserved] Remittances by the University System of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 2; repealed by Ga. L. 2020, p. 94, § 1/HB 292, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 94, § 1/HB 292 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2020.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, the Code section designation number, inadvertently deleted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 94, § 1/HB 292, was added back in.

47-21-6.
Payment of retirement, death, or other benefit.

No retirement, death, or other benefit shall be paid by the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia to or on behalf of a participating employee in the optional retirement plan based upon any service rendered by such employee while a member of the optional retirement plan or while covered by such plan. Benefits are payable to participating employees or their beneficiaries by the designated companies in accordance with the terms of the annuity contracts.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 173, § 1.

47-21-7.
Treatment of annuity contracts under Code Section 33-38-2.

Annuity contracts issued under the optional retirement plan provided for in this chapter shall be treated under Code Section 33-38-2 in the same manner as contracts qualified under Section 403(b) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 2.

47-21-8.
Actuarial study by state auditor.

By not later than January 1, 2000, the state auditor shall have an actuarial study completed to determine what effect the optional retirement plan provided for in this chapter has had on the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia. The results of such study shall be reported to the General Assembly at the 2000 regular session.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-21-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1811, § 2; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1244, § 2.